Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2702
Foreign trade zones; establishment, operation, and maintenance.

Any private corporation or public corporation shall have the power to apply to the proper authorities of the United States for a grant of the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining foreign trade zones and foreign trade subzones under the provisions of the Act of Congress and, when such grant is issued, to accept such grant and to establish, operate and maintain such foreign trade zones and foreign trade subzones and to do all things necessary and proper to carry into effect the establishment, operation and maintenance of such zones, all in accordance with the Act of Congress and other applicable law and rules and regulations.

Laws 1973, LB 387, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 21-20,146.